Mississippi, session 2026, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-19-81, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-81.  Every person convicted in this state of a * * * felony crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2 who shall have been convicted twice previously of any such felony or federal crime upon charges separately brought and arising out of separate incidents at different times and who shall have been sentenced to separate terms of one (1) year or more in any state and/or federal penal institution, whether in this state or elsewhere, and where any one (1) of such felonies is defined as a crime of violence by Section 97-3-2 shall be sentenced to the maximum term of imprisonment prescribed for such felony unless the court provides an explanation in its sentencing order setting forth the cause for deviating from the maximum sentence, and such sentence shall not be * * *reduced or suspended nor shall such person be eligible for * * *parole or probation. SECTION 2.  Section 99-19-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-83.  Every person convicted in this state of a * * * felony a crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2, who shall have been convicted twice previously of * * *any such felony or federal crime upon charges separately brought and arising out of separate incidents at different times and who shall have been sentenced to and served separate terms of one (1) year or more, whether served concurrently or not, in any state and/or federal penal institution, whether in this state or elsewhere, and where * * *any one (1) of such felonies shall have been * * * a crimes of violence, as defined by Section 97-3-2, shall be sentenced to life imprisonment, and such sentence shall not be * * *reduced or suspended nor shall such person be eligible for * * *parole, probation * * *or any other form of early release from actual physical custody within the Department of Corrections.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a person's eligibility for parole and any other form of early release from actual physical custody within the Department of Corrections shall be consistent with the eligibility set forth for the offense or offenses for which the person was sentenced pursuant to this statute.  For the purposes of early release, life sentences handed down pursuant to this statute shall be calculated at fifty (50) years. SECTION 3.  Section 47-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-7-3.  (1)  Every prisoner who has been convicted of any offense against the State of Mississippi, and is confined in the execution of a judgment of such conviction in the Mississippi Department of Corrections for a definite term or terms of one (1) year or over, or for the term of his or her natural life, whose record of conduct shows that such prisoner has observed the rules of the department, and who has served the minimum required time for parole eligibility, may be released on parole as set forth herein: (a)  Habitual offenders.  Except as provided by Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87, no person sentenced as a confirmed and habitual criminal for a crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2 shall be eligible for parole; (b)  Sex offenders. Any person who has been sentenced for a sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23(h) shall not be released on parole except for a person under the age of nineteen (19) who has been convicted under Section 97-3-67; (c)  Capital offenders.  No person sentenced for the following offenses shall be eligible for parole: (i)  Capital murder committed on or after July 1, 1994, as defined in Section 97-3-19(2); (ii)  Any offense to which an offender is sentenced to life imprisonment under the provisions of Section 99-19-101; or (iii)  Any offense to which an offender is sentenced to life imprisonment without eligibility for parole under the provisions of Section 99-19-101, whose crime was committed on or after July 1, 1994; (d)  Murder.  No person sentenced for murder in the first degree, whose crime was committed on or after June 30, 1995, or murder in the second degree, as defined in Section 97-3-19, shall be eligible for parole; (e)  Human trafficking.  No person sentenced for human trafficking, as defined in Section 97-3-54.1, whose crime was committed on or after July 1, 2014, shall be eligible for parole; (f)  Drug trafficking.  No person sentenced for trafficking and aggravated trafficking, as defined in Section 41-29-139(f) through (g), shall be eligible for parole; (g)  Offenses specifically prohibiting parole release.  No person shall be eligible for parole who is convicted of any offense that specifically prohibits parole release; (h)  (i)  Offenders eligible for parole consideration for offenses committed after June 30, 1995. Except as provided in paragraphs (a) through (g) of this subsection, offenders may be considered eligible for parole release as follows: 1.  Nonviolent crimes.  All persons sentenced for a nonviolent offense shall be eligible for parole only after they have served twenty-five percent (25%) or ten (10) years, whichever is less, of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court.  For purposes of this paragraph, "nonviolent crime" means a felony not designated as a crime of violence in Section 97-3-2. 2.  Violent crimes.  A person who is sentenced for a violent offense as defined in Section 97-3-2, except robbery with a deadly weapon as defined in Section 97-3-79, drive-by shooting as defined in Section 97-3-109, and carjacking as defined in Section 97-3-117, shall be eligible for parole only after having served fifty percent (50%) or twenty (20) years, whichever is less, of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court.  Those persons sentenced for robbery with a deadly weapon as defined in Section 97-3-79, drive-by shooting as defined in Section 97-3-109, and carjacking as defined in Section 97-3-117, shall be eligible for parole only after having served sixty percent (60%) or twenty-five (25) years, whichever is less, of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court. 3.  Nonviolent and nonhabitual drug offenses.  A person who has been sentenced to a drug offense pursuant to Section 41-29-139(a) through (d), whose crime was committed after June 30, 1995, shall be eligible for parole only after he has served twenty-five percent (25%) or ten (10) years, whichever is less, of the sentence or sentences imposed. (ii)  Parole hearing required.  All persons eligible for parole under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (h) who are serving a sentence or sentences for a crime of violence, as defined in Section 97-3-2, shall be required to have a parole hearing before the Parole Board pursuant to Section 47-7-17, prior to parole release. (iii)  Geriatric parole.  Notwithstanding the provisions in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (h), a person serving a sentence who has reached the age of sixty (60) or older and who has served no less than ten (10) years of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court shall be eligible for parole.  Any person eligible for parole under this subparagraph (iii) shall be required to have a parole hearing before the board prior to parole release.  No inmate shall be eligible for parole under this subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (h) if: 1.  The inmate is sentenced as a habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87; 2.  The inmate is sentenced for a crime of violence under Section 97-3-2; 3.  The inmate is sentenced for an offense that specifically prohibits parole release; 4.  The inmate is sentenced for trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139(f); 5.  The inmate is sentenced for a sex crime; or 6.  The inmate has not served one-fourth (1/4) of the sentence imposed by the court. (iv)  Parole consideration as authorized by the trial court.  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, any offender who has not committed a crime of violence under Section 97-3-2 and has served twenty-five percent (25%) or more of his sentence may be paroled by the State Parole Board if, after the sentencing judge or if the sentencing judge is retired, disabled or incapacitated, the senior circuit judge authorizes the offender to be eligible for parole consideration; or if the senior circuit judge must be recused, another circuit judge of the same district or a senior status judge may hear and decide the matter.  A petition for parole eligibility consideration pursuant to this subparagraph (iv) shall be filed in the original criminal cause or causes, and the offender shall serve an executed copy of the petition on the District Attorney.  The court may, in its discretion, require the District Attorney to respond to the petition. (2)  The State Parole Board shall, by rules and regulations, establish a method of determining a tentative parole hearing date for each eligible offender taken into the custody of the Department of Corrections.  The tentative parole hearing date shall be determined within ninety (90) days after the department has assumed custody of the offender.  Except as provided in Section 47-7-18, the parole hearing date shall occur when the offender is within thirty (30) days of the month of his parole eligibility date.  Any parole eligibility date shall not be earlier than as required in this section. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an inmate shall not be eligible to receive earned time, good time or any other administrative reduction of time which shall reduce the time necessary to be served for parole eligibility as provided in subsection (1) of this section. (4)  Any inmate within forty-eight (48) months of his parole eligibility date and who meets the criteria established by the classification board shall receive priority for placement in any educational development and job-training programs that are part of his or her parole case plan.  Any inmate refusing to participate in an educational development or job-training program, including, but not limited to, programs required as part of the case plan, shall be in jeopardy of noncompliance with the case plan and may be denied parole. (5)  In addition to other requirements, if an offender is convicted of a drug or driving under the influence felony, the offender must complete a drug and alcohol rehabilitation program prior to parole, or the offender shall be required to complete a postrelease drug and alcohol program as a condition of parole. (6)  Except as provided in subsection (1)(a) through (h) of this section, all other persons shall be eligible for parole after serving twenty-five percent (25%) of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court, or, if sentenced to thirty (30) years or more, after serving ten (10) years of the sentence or sentences imposed by the trial court. (7)  The Corrections and Criminal Justice Oversight Task Force established in Section 47-5-6 shall develop and submit recommendations to the Governor and to the Legislature annually on or before December 1st concerning issues relating to juvenile and habitual offender parole reform and to review and monitor the implementation of Chapter 479, Laws of 2021. (8)  The amendments contained in Chapter 479, Laws of 2021, shall apply retroactively from and after July 1, 1995. (9)  Notwithstanding provisions to the contrary in this section, a person who was sentenced before July 1, 2021, may be considered for parole if the person's sentence would have been parole eligible before July 1, 2021. (10)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * *2027 2029. SECTION 4.  Section 47-5-139, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-139.  (1)  An inmate shall not be eligible for the earned time allowance if: (a)  The inmate was sentenced to life imprisonment; but an inmate, except an inmate sentenced to life imprisonment for capital murder, who has reached the age of sixty-five (65) or older and who has served at least fifteen (15) years may petition the sentencing court for conditional release; (b)  The inmate * * *was is serving a sentence for a crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2, and was convicted as a habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87; (c)  The inmate has forfeited his earned time allowance by order of the commissioner; (d)  The inmate was convicted of a sex crime; or (e)  The inmate has not served the mandatory time required for parole eligibility for a conviction of robbery or attempted robbery with a deadly weapon. (2)  An offender under two (2) or more consecutive sentences shall be allowed commutation based upon the total term of the sentences. (3)  All earned time shall be forfeited by the inmate in the event of escape and/or aiding and abetting an escape.  The commissioner may restore all or part of the earned time if the escapee returns to the institution voluntarily, without expense to the state, and without act of violence while a fugitive from the facility. (4)  Any officer or employee who shall willfully violate the provisions of this section and be convicted therefor shall be removed from office or employment. SECTION 5.  Section 47-5-138.1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 47-5-138.1.  (1)  In addition to any other administrative reduction of sentence, an offender in trusty status as defined by the classification board of the Department of Corrections may be awarded a trusty-time allowance of thirty (30) days' reduction of sentence for each thirty (30) days of participation during any calendar month in an approved program while in trusty status, including satisfactory participation in education or instructional programs, satisfactory participation in work projects and satisfactory participation in any special incentive program. (2)  An offender in trusty status shall not be eligible for a reduction of sentence under this section if: (a)  The offender was sentenced to life imprisonment; (b)  The offender * * *was is serving a sentence for a crime of violence as defined by Section 97-3-2, and was convicted as an habitual offender under Sections 99-19-81 through 99-19-87; (c)  The offender was convicted of a sex crime; (d)  The offender has not served the mandatory time required for parole eligibility, as prescribed under Section 47-7-3, for a conviction of robbery or attempted robbery through the display of a deadly weapon, carjacking through the display of a deadly weapon or a drive-by shooting; or (e)  The offender was convicted of trafficking in controlled substances under Section 41-29-139. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.